Hawaii statutes.
§287-18 Payment sufficient to satisfy
requirements. Judgments herein referred to shall, for the purpose of this
chapter only, be deemed satisfied:

(1) When $25,000 is credited upon any judgment or
judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of accidental harm
sustained by any one person as a result of any one accident applicable to each
person sustaining accidental harm; or

(2) When $10,000 is credited upon any judgment or
judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of injury to or destruction
of property of others as a result of any one accident.

Payments made in settlement of any claims because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident
shall be credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section. [L
1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-96; am L 1963, c 98, §1; HRS §287-18; am L
1982, c 210, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next